Utah statutes.
63J-3-401.   State mandated property tax limitation -- Vote requirement
needed to exceed limitation.
The state mandated property tax rate in Title 53A, Chapter 17a, Minimum School
Program Act, as of July 1, 1989, may not be increased without more than a two-
thirds vote of both houses of the Legislature.
